en: Baby & Toddler > Nursing & Feeding > Feeding Essentials > Baby Bottle Nipples & Liners: Baby Bottle Liners; Baby Bottle Nipples
de: Baby & Kleinkind > Stillen & Füttern > Zubehör für Babynahrung > Ein- und Aufsätze für Babyflaschen: Nuckelflascheneinsätze; Nuckelflaschenaufsätze
da: Baby og småbørn > Amning og madning > Nødvendigheder til bespisning > Sutteflaske – sut: Indlægsposer til sutteflaske; Sutter til babysutteflaske
tr: Bebek ve Küçük Çocuk Ürünleri > Emzirme ve Beslenme > Beslenme Gereçleri > Biberon Emzikleri ve Astarları: Biberon Astarları; Biberon Emzikleri
it: Bebè e bimbi > Allattamento e alimentazione > Alimenti essenziali > Tettarelle e sacche usa e getta per biberon: Fodere per biberon; Tettarelle per biberon
fr: Bébés et tout-petits > Allaitement et alimentation > Essentiels pour l’alimentation > Tétines et sacs pour biberons: Sacs pour biberon; Tétines pour biberon
sk-SK: Bábätká > Dojčenie a kŕmenie > Základné potreby na kŕmenie > Cumlíky a vložky do dojčenských fliaš: Vložky do dojčenských fliaš; Cumlíky do dojčenských fliaš
hu: Baba- és csecsemő > Szoptatás és etetés > Etetőkellékek > Cumisüvegbimbók és -betétek: Cumisüvegbetétek; Cumisüvegbimbók
sv: Baby och småbarn > Amning och matning > Nutrition > Sugnappar och insatser till nappflaskor: Liners för nappflaska; Nipplar för nappflaska
ja: ベビー用品 > 授乳・離乳食 > 離乳食用品 > 哺乳瓶用乳首・取替えパック: 哺乳瓶用ライナー; 哺乳瓶用乳首
th: ทารกและเด็กเล็ก > การให้นม > อุปกรณ์สำคัญในการป้อนอาหารเด็ก > จุกและที่รองขวดนมสำหรับทารก: ถุงใส่นมสำหรับขวดนมพกพา; จุกนม
zh-CN: 婴幼儿用品 > 哺乳与喂养 > 喂养必需品 > 婴儿奶瓶奶嘴/内衬: 婴儿奶瓶内衬; 婴儿奶瓶奶嘴
zh-TW: 嬰幼兒 > 哺育和餵食 > 餵食必需品 > 奶瓶內袋和奶嘴: 嬰兒奶瓶組; 嬰兒奶瓶奶嘴
el: Βρεφικά & παιδικά είδη > Θηλασμός & σίτιση > Απαραίτητα σκεύη σίτισης > Θηλές & επενδύσεις για μπιμπερό: Επενδύσεις για μπιμπερό; Θηλές για μπιμπερό
ru: Товары для детей > Питание и кормление > Посуда для кормления > Соски и вкладыши для детских бутылочек: Вкладыши для детских бутылочек; Соски для детских бутылочек
pt-BR: Infantil > Amamentação e alimentação > Itens essenciais para alimentação > Bicos e revestimentos internos para mamadeira: Forros de mamadeiras; Bicos de mamadeira
nb: Baby og barn > Amming og mating > Nødvendigheter for fôring > Tuter og innlegg for babyflasker: Innlegg for babyflasker; Tuter for babyflasker
sl-SI: Dojenčki in malčki > Dojenje in hranjenje > Osnovni pripomočki za hranjenje > Cuclji in vložki za stekleničke: Vložki za stekleničke; Cuclji za stekleničke
vi: Trẻ sơ sinh và trẻ tập đi > Cho con bú và cho ăn > Dụng cụ ăn dặm > Núm ti và túi lót bình sữa: Túi lót bình sữa; Núm ti bình sữa
ro-RO: Bebeluși și copii mici > Alăptare și hrănire > Articole esențiale pentru hrănire > Tetine și inserții pentru biberoane: Inserții pentru biberoane; Tetine pentru biberoane
hr-HR: Bebe i mala djeca > Dojenje i hranjenje > Pribor za hranjenje > Dude i obloge za dječje bočice: Obloge za dječje bočice; Dude za dječje bočice
cs: Děti a kojenci > Kojení a krmení > Základní potřeby ke krmení > Dudlíky na kojenecké lahve: Antikolikové vložky do kojeneckých lahví; Savičky do kojeneckých lahví
ko: 영유아 > 수유/이유식 용품 > 유아식 필수품 > 젖병 꼭지/라이너: 젖병 라이너; 젖병 젖꼭지
lt-LT: Kūdikiai ir maži vaikai > Žindymas ir maitinimas > Būtiniausi maitinimo reikmenys > Kūdikių buteliukų čiulptukai ir įdėklai: Kūdikių buteliukų įdėklai; Kūdikių buteliukų čiulptukai
fi: Vauvat ja leikki-ikäiset > Imetys ja syöttäminen > Syöttämisen perustarvikkeet > Pullotutit ja tuttipullon pussit: Tuttipullon pussit; Pullotutit
nl: Baby en peuter > Borstvoeding en voeding > Voedingsbenodigdheden > Spenen en melkzakjes voor babyflessen: Zuigfles beschermer; Zuigfles speen
pt-PT: Bebé e criança > Amamentação e alimentação > Essencial para alimentação > Capas e tetinas para biberões de bebé: Capas de biberões de bebé; Tetinas para biberões de bebé
bg-BG: Бебета и малки деца > Кърмене и хранене > Прибори за хранене на бебета > Биберони и накрайници за бебешки шишета: Накрайници за бебешки шишета; Биберони за бебешки шишета
es: Bebés y niños pequeños > Lactancia y alimentación > Artículos esenciales de alimentación > Tetinas y fundas para biberones: Fundas para biberones; Tetinas para biberones
pl: Dzieci i niemowlęta > Karmienie > Podstawowe artykuły do karmienia niemowląt > Smoczki i wkładki do butelek: Wkładki do butelek dla niemowląt; Smoczki do butelek dla niemowląt